Utah statutes.
10-3-903.   City engineer -- Custodian of records of public improvements.
The city engineer's office in cities of the first and the second class shall
be an office of record for all maps, plans, plats, profiles, drawings, final
estimates, specifications and contracts which in any way relate to the public
improvements and engineering affairs of the city. The city engineer shall be
custodian of all drawings and documents above mentioned.
